Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-294.04
Appropriation; temporary transfer or change; effect on rights of condemnation.

During the time within which a temporary transfer or change in purpose of use of an appropriation is in effect, the appropriation may not be used to invoke any rights of condemnation that are based on preference of use, but such appropriation shall be subject to the exercise of such rights by owners of other appropriations that are for water uses superior to the pretransfer or prechange use of the water under the transferred or changed appropriation.

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 24.